Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-289
Unbroken chain of title; title transaction; defined.

A person shall be deemed to have the unbroken chain of title to an interest in real estate as such terms are used in sections 25-207, 25-213, 40-104, and 76-288 to 76-298 when the official public records of the county wherein such land is situated disclose a conveyance or other title transaction dated and recorded twenty-two years or more prior thereto, which conveyance or other title transaction purports to create such interest in such person or his immediate or remote grantors, with nothing appearing of record purporting to divest such person and his immediate or remote grantors of such purported interest.

Title transaction as used in sections 25-207, 25-213, 40-104, and 76-288 to 76-298, means any transaction affecting title to real estate, including title by will or descent from any person who held title of record at the date of his death, title by a decree or order of any court, title by tax deed or by trustee's, referee's, guardian's, executor's, master's in chancery, or sheriff's deed, as well as by direct conveyance.

Laws 1947, c. 243, § 2, p. 763.

Grantee under ordinary quitclaim deed is not entitled to invoke protection of Marketable Title Act. Smith v. Berberich, 168 Neb. 142, 95 N.W.2d 325 (1959).